Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-282
Mobile telephone communication, defined.

Mobile telephone communication means a radio communication that is transmitted on frequencies allocated under 47 C.F.R. 26.301, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2002.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 144.